Utah statutes.
64-13-33.   Restitution for offenses -- Debt collection.

(1)  Following an administrative hearing, the department is authorized to require restitution from an offender for expenses incurred by the department as a result of the offender's violation of department rules.  The department is authorized to require payment from the offender's account or to place a hold on it to secure compliance with this section.

(2)  The department shall turn over to the Office of State Debt Collection any debt under this section that is unpaid at the time the offender is released from parole.



Amended by Chapter 258, 2009 General Session

